dictsource/ka_rules
// translation rules for Georgian
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// all words lower case

.group ა
        ა        a
     -) ა (_     %a

.group ბ
        ბ        b

.group გ
        გ        g

.group დ
        დ        d

.group ე
        ე        e
     -) ე (_     %e

.group ვ
        ვ        v

.group ზ
        ზ        z

.group თ
        თ        t#

.group ი
        ი        i
     -) ი (_     %i

.group კ
        კ        k

.group ლ
        ლ        l

.group მ
        მ        m

.group ნ
        ნ        n

.group ო
        ო        o
     -) ო (_     %o

.group პ
        პ        p

.group ჟ
        ჟ        Z

.group რ
        რ        r
     K) რ (CC    r@-

.group ს
        ს        s

.group ტ
        ტ        t

.group უ
        უ        u
     -) უ (_     %u

.group ფ
        ფ        p#

.group ქ
        ქ        k#

.group ღ
        ღ        Q

.group ყ
        ყ        q

.group შ
        შ        S

.group ჩ
        ჩ        tS

.group ც
        ც        ts#

.group ძ
        ძ        dz

.group წ
        წ        ts

.group ჭ
        ჭ        c

.group ხ
        ხ        x

.group ჯ
        ჯ        dZ

.group ჰ
        ჰ        h

.group ჱ
        ჱ        ej

.group ჲ
        ჲ        j

.group ჳ
        ჳ        w

.group ჴ
        ჴ        x

.group ჵ
        ჵ        o:

.group ჶ
        ჶ        f

.group ჷ
        ჷ        @

.group ჸ
        ჸ        ?

.group ჹ
        ჹ

.group ჺ
        ჺ

// For cyrillic characters (U+0400 to U+04FF) use Russian voice
//.group 0xd0
//	0xd0	_^_RU
//.group 0xd1
//	0xd1	_^_RU
//.group 0xd2
//	0xd2	_^_RU
//.group 0xd3
//	0xd3	_^_RU

.group
	$	dolari
